en: Motor vehicle bulb application/position: Auxiliary/off-road light; Brake light; Courtesy/door light; Daytime running light (DRL); Fog light; Front turn signal; Headlight – high beam; Headlight – low beam; Instrument/cluster light; Interior dome/map light; License plate light; Motorcycle headlight; Parking/position light; Rear turn signal; Reverse light; Side marker light; Tail/running light; Third brake light (CHMSL); Trunk/cargo light; Other
el: Εφαρμογή/θέση λαμπτήρα μηχανοκίνητου οχήματος: Βοηθητικό φως/εκτός δρόμου; Φως φρένων; Φως πλαφονιέρας/πόρτας; Φως ημέρας (DRL); Προβολέας ομίχλης; Μπροστινό φλας; Προβολέας – μεγάλη σκάλα; Προβολέας – μεσαία σκάλα; Φως οργάνων/καντράν; Εσωτερικό φως οροφής/ανάγνωσης χάρτη; Φως πινακίδας; Προβολέας μοτοσικλέτας; Φως στάθμευσης/θέσης; Πίσω φλας; Φως όπισθεν; Πλευρικό φως σήμανσης; Πίσω φως/φως πορείας; Τρίτο φως φρένων (CHMSL); Φως πορτμπαγκάζ/χώρου αποσκευών; Άλλο
it: Applicazione/posizione della lampadina per veicoli a motore: Luce ausiliaria/fuoristrada; Luce dei freni; Luce di cortesia/portiera; Luce di marcia diurna (DRL); Fendinebbia; Indicatore di direzione anteriore; Faro anteriore – abbagliante; Faro anteriore – anabbagliante; Luce strumenti/cruscotto; Luce interna plafoniera/lettura; Luce targa; Faro anteriore per moto; Luce di parcheggio/posizione; Indicatore di direzione posteriore; Luce di retromarcia; Luce d’ingombro laterale; Luce posteriore/di marcia; Terzo stop (CHMSL); Luce bagagliaio/vano di carico; Altro
hr-HR: Žarulja za motorna vozila aplikacija/position: Pomoćno / terensko svjetlo; Svjetlo kočnice; Svjetlo dobrodošlice / u vratima; Dnevno svjetlo (DRL); Svjetlo za maglu; Prednji pokazivač smjera; Prednje svjetlo – dugo; Prednje svjetlo – kratko; Svjetlo instrumentne ploče; Unutarnje krovno svjetlo / svjetlo za čitanje; Svjetlo registarske pločice; Prednje svjetlo za motocikl; Pozicijsko / parkirno svjetlo; Stražnji pokazivač smjera; Svjetlo za vožnju unatrag; Bočno gabaritno svjetlo; Stražnje/pozicijsko svjetlo; Treće svjetlo kočnice (CHMSL); Svjetlo u prtljažniku / teretnom prostoru; Ostalo
sl-SI: Namen uporabe/položaj žarnice motornega vozila: Pomožna luč / luč za terensko vožnjo; Zavorna luč; Luč za vstop/na vratih; Dnevna luč (DRL); Meglenka; Sprednji smernik; Žaromet – dolga luč; Žaromet – kratka luč; Luč instrumentne plošče; Notranja stropna/bralna luč; Luč za registrsko tablico; Motociklistični žaromet; Parkirna/pozicijska luč; Zadnji smernik; Luč za vzvratno vožnjo; Stranska označevalna luč; Zadnja/dnevna luč; Tretja zavorna luč (CHMSL); Luč prtljažnika/tovornega prostora; Drugo
nl: Motorvoertuiglamp toepassing/positie: Hulplicht/offroadlicht; Remlicht; Instaplicht/deurlicht; Dagrijlicht (DRL); Mistlamp; Knipperlicht voor; Koplamp – grootlicht; Koplamp – dimlicht; Instrumenten-/dashboardlicht; Binnenverlichting/leeslamp; Kentekenverlichting; Koplamp motorfiets; Parkeerlicht/stadslicht; Knipperlicht achter; Achteruitrijlicht; Zijmarkeringslicht; Achterlicht/contourlicht; Derde remlicht (CHMSL); Kofferbak-/laadruimteverlichting; Overig
fr: Position ou fonction de l’ampoule dans le véhicule: Feu auxiliaire/tout-terrain; Feu stop; Éclairage de courtoisie/portière; Feu de jour (DRL); Feu de brouillard; Clignotant avant; Phare – feu de route; Phare – feu de croisement; Éclairage d’instruments/tableau de bord; Plafonnier/liseuse; Éclairage de plaque d’immatriculation; Phare de moto; Feu de stationnement/position; Clignotant arrière; Feu de recul; Feu de position latéral; Feu arrière/de position; Troisième feu stop (CHMSL); Éclairage de coffre/chargement; Autre
tr: Motorlu taşıt ampulü kullanım konumu: Yardımcı/off-road farı; Fren lambası; Karşılama/kapı lambası; Gündüz sürüş farı (DRL); Sis farı; Ön sinyal lambası; Far – uzun hüzmeli; Far – kısa hüzmeli; Gösterge/panel lambası; İç tepe/harita lambası; Plaka lambası; Motosiklet farı; Park/konum lambası; Arka sinyal lambası; Geri vites lambası; Yan işaret lambası; Arka/sürüş lambası; Üçüncü fren lambası (CHMSL); Bagaj/kargo lambası; Diğer
pt-PT: aplicação/posição da lâmpada do veículo motorizado: Luz auxiliar/todo-o-terreno; Luz de travagem; Luz de cortesia/porta; Luz de condução diurna (DRL); Luz de nevoeiro; Pisca dianteiro; Farol/máximos; Farol/médios; Luz de instrumentos/painel; Luz de tejadilho/leitura; Luz da matrícula; Farol de motociclo; Luz de presença/estacionamento; Pisca traseiro; Luz de marcha-atrás; Luz delimitadora lateral; Farolim traseiro/luz de presença; Terceira luz de travagem (CHMSL); Luz da bagageira/carga; Outro
fi: Ajoneuvon polttimon käyttökohde tai sijainti: Lisävalo/maastovalo; Jarruvalo; Ovivalo / sisävalo; Päiväajovalo (DRL); Sumuvalo; Etusuuntavilkku; Ajovalo – kaukovalo; Ajovalo – lähivalo; Mittariston valo; Sisätilan kattovalo/lukuvalo; Rekisterikilven valo; Moottoripyörän ajovalo; Pysäköintivalo/äärivalo; Takasuuntavilkku; Peruutusvalo; Sivuäärivalo; Takavalo/ajovalo; Kolmas jarruvalo (CHMSL); Tavaratilan valo; Muu
zh-TW: 汽車燈泡用途/位置: 輔助/越野燈; 煞車燈; 迎賓/車門燈; 晝行燈 (DRL); 霧燈; 前方向燈; 頭燈 – 遠光燈; 頭燈 – 近光燈; 儀表板/儀表組燈; 車內頂燈/閱讀燈; 牌照燈; 機車頭燈; 駐車燈/定位燈; 後方向燈; 倒車燈; 側邊標示燈; 尾燈/定位燈; 第三煞車燈 (CHMSL); 行李箱/貨廂燈; 其他
sk-SK: Použitie/umiestnenie žiaroviek v motorových vozidlách: Prídavné/terénne svetlo; Brzdové svetlo; Osvetlenie nástupného priestoru/dverí; Denné svietenie (DRL); Hmlové svetlo; Predná smerovka; Predné svetlo – diaľkové; Predné svetlo – stretávacie; Osvetlenie prístrojovej dosky; Osvetlenie interiéru/na čítanie; Osvetlenie evidenčného čísla; Predné svetlo motocykla; Parkovacie/obrysové svetlo; Zadná smerovka; Cúvacie svetlo; Bočné obrysové svetlo; Koncové/denné svetlo; Tretie brzdové svetlo (CHMSL); Osvetlenie kufra/nákladného priestoru; Iné
th: การติดตั้ง/ตำแหน่งหลอดไฟรถยนต์: ไฟเสริม/ไฟออฟโรด; ไฟเบรก; ไฟส่องเท้า/ไฟส่องประตู; ไฟส่องสว่างเวลากลางวัน (DRL); ไฟตัดหมอก; ไฟเลี้ยวหน้า; ไฟหน้า - ไฟสูง; ไฟหน้า - ไฟต่ำ; ไฟหน้าปัด/แผงหน้าปัด; ไฟเพดาน/ไฟอ่านแผนที่; ไฟส่องป้ายทะเบียน; ไฟหน้ารถจักรยานยนต์; ไฟจอด/ไฟหรี่; ไฟเลี้ยวหลัง; ไฟถอยหลัง; ไฟเลี้ยวด้านข้าง; ไฟท้าย/ไฟส่องสว่าง; ไฟเบรกดวงที่สาม (CHMSL); ไฟส่องสัมภาระท้ายรถ; อื่นๆ
cs: Aplikace/poloha žárovky motorového vozidla: Přídavné/terénní světlo; Brzdové světlo; Osvětlení nástupního prostoru / dveří; Světlo denního svícení (DRL); Mlhovka; Přední blinkr; Přední světlo – dálkové; Přední světlo – potkávací; Osvětlení přístrojové desky; Osvětlení interiéru / čtecí lampička; Osvětlení SPZ; Přední světlo motocyklu; Parkovací/poziční světlo; Zadní blinkr; Couvací světlo; Boční obrysové světlo; Zadní obrysové světlo; Třetí brzdové světlo (CHMSL); Osvětlení kufru/zavazadlového prostoru; Jiné
vi: Vị trí/cách lắp đặt bóng đèn xe cơ giới: Đèn phụ trợ/đèn off-road; Đèn phanh; Đèn cửa/đèn chào mừng; Đèn chạy ban ngày (DRL); Đèn sương mù; Đèn báo rẽ phía trước; Đèn pha; Đèn cốt; Đèn cụm đồng hồ; Đèn trần/đèn đọc bản đồ nội thất; Đèn biển số; Đèn pha xe máy; Đèn đỗ xe/đèn vị trí; Đèn báo rẽ phía sau; Đèn lùi; Đèn sườn xe; Đèn hậu/đèn chạy ban đêm; Đèn phanh thứ ba (CHMSL); Đèn cốp/đèn chở hàng; Khác
da: Anvendelse/placering af pære i motorkøretøj: Ekstralygte/offroad-lygte; Bremselys; Indstigningslys/dørlys; Kørelys (DRL); Tågelygte; Forreste blinklys; Forlygte – fjernlys; Forlygte – nærlys; Instrumentbelysning; Indvendig kabinebelysning/læselys; Nummerpladelys; Forlygte til motorcykel; Parkeringslys/positionslys; Bageste blinklys; Baklys; Sidemarkeringslys; Baglys/kørelys; Tredje bremselys (CHMSL); Bagagerumslys/lastrumslys; Andet
nb: Bruksområde/plassering for kjøretøylampe: Ekstralys/offroad-lys; Bremselys; Innstegslys/dørlys; Kjørelys (DRL); Tåkelys; Blinklys foran; Frontlys – fjernlys; Frontlys – nærlys; Instrumentlys; Kupélys/leselys; Skiltlys; Motorsykkelfrontlys; Parkeringslys/posisjonslys; Blinklys bak; Ryggelys; Sidemarkeringslys; Baklys/kjørelys; Tredje bremselys (CHMSL); Bagasjeromslys/lasteromslys; Annet
de: Anwendungsbereich/Position der Kfz-Glühlampe: Zusatz-/Offroad-Scheinwerfer; Bremslicht; Einstiegs-/Türbeleuchtung; Tagfahrlicht (DRL); Nebelscheinwerfer; Blinker vorn; Scheinwerfer – Fernlicht; Scheinwerfer – Abblendlicht; Instrumenten-/Tachobeleuchtung; Innenraum-/Leseleuchte; Kennzeichenbeleuchtung; Motorradscheinwerfer; Park-/Positionslicht; Blinker hinten; Rückfahrlicht; Seitenmarkierungsleuchte; Rück-/Schlusslicht; Drittes Bremslicht (CHMSL); Kofferraum-/Laderaumbeleuchtung; Sonstige
pt-BR: Veículo automotor lâmpada aplicação/posição: Luz auxiliar/off-road; Luz de freio; Luz de cortesia/porta; Luz de rodagem diurna (DRL); Farol de neblina; Seta dianteira; Farol - luz alta; Farol - luz baixa; Luz de painel de instrumentos; Luz de teto/leitura interna; Luz da placa de licença; Farol de motocicleta; Luz de estacionamento/posição; Seta traseira; Luz de ré; Luz de posição lateral; Luz traseira/lanterna; Terceira luz de freio (CHMSL); Luz do porta-malas/carga; Outra
pl: Aplikacja/pozycja żarówki samochodowej: Światło dodatkowe/terenowe; Światło hamowania (stop); Światło powitalne/drzwi; Światło do jazdy dziennej (DRL); Światło przeciwmgielne; Przedni kierunkowskaz; Reflektor – światło drogowe; Reflektor – światło mijania; Oświetlenie wskaźników/deski rozdzielczej; Oświetlenie wnętrza/do czytania; Oświetlenie tablicy rejestracyjnej; Reflektor motocyklowy; Światło parkingowe/pozycyjne; Tylny kierunkowskaz; Światło cofania; Światło obrysowe boczne; Światło tylne/pozycyjne; Trzecie światło hamowania (CHMSL); Oświetlenie bagażnika/przestrzeni ładunkowej; Inne
bg-BG: Приложение/позиция на крушката за моторно превозно средство: Спомагателна/офроуд светлина; Стоп светлина; Осветление за врата/купе; Дневна светлина (DRL); Фар за мъгла; Преден мигач; Фар – дълги светлини; Фар – къси светлини; Осветление на таблото/инструментите; Вътрешно плафонно/локално осветление; Осветление на регистрационната табела; Фар за мотоциклет; Габаритна светлина; Заден мигач; Светлина за заден ход; Странична габаритна светлина; Задна/габаритна светлина; Трета стоп светлина (CHMSL); Осветление на багажника/товарното отделение; Друго
ro-RO: Aplicație/poziție bec autovehicul: Lumină auxiliară/de off-road; Lumină de frână; Lumină de curtoazie/portieră; Lumină de zi (DRL); Proiector de ceață; Semnalizator față; Far – fază lungă; Far – fază scurtă; Lumină instrumente/bord; Plafonieră/lumină pentru citit; Lumină plăcuță de înmatriculare; Far pentru motocicletă; Lumină de parcare/poziție; Semnalizator spate; Lumină de marșarier; Lumină de gabarit laterală; Lumină spate/de poziție; A treia lumină de frână (CHMSL); Lumină portbagaj/marfă; Altele
ko: 차량용 전구 장착 부위/위치: 보조/오프로드 조명; 브레이크등; 커티시/도어 라이트; 주간 주행등(DRL); 안개등; 전면 방향지시등; 헤드라이트 – 상향등; 헤드라이트 – 하향등; 계기판/클러스터 조명; 실내 돔/맵 라이트; 번호판등; 오토바이 헤드라이트; 주차/차폭등; 후면 방향지시등; 후진등; 측면 마커 조명; 테일/주행등; 보조 제동등(CHMSL); 트렁크/적재함 조명; 기타
zh-CN: 机动车灯泡应用/位置: 辅助/越野灯; 刹车灯; 迎宾/车门灯; 日间行车灯（DRL）; 雾灯; 前转向灯; 大灯 - 远光灯; 大灯 - 近光灯; 仪表/组合仪表灯; 车内顶灯/阅读灯; 牌照灯; 摩托车大灯; 驻车/示宽灯; 后转向灯; 倒车灯; 侧标志灯; 尾灯/行车灯; 高位刹车灯（CHMSL）; 后备箱/载货区照明灯; 其他
hu: Gépjárműizzó alkalmazása/elhelyezkedése: Kiegészítő-/terepvilágítás; Féklámpa; Kilépőfény/ajtóvilágítás; Nappali menetfény (DRL); Ködlámpa; Első irányjelző; Fényszóró – távolsági fényszóró; Fényszóró – tompított fényszóró; Műszerfal-világítás; Belső mennyezeti/olvasólámpa; Rendszámtábla-világítás; Motorkerékpár fényszóró; Parkolófény/helyzetjelző; Hátsó irányjelző; Tolatólámpa; Oldalsó helyzetjelző; Hátsó lámpa/menetfény; Harmadik féklámpa (CHMSL); Csomagtérvilágítás; Egyéb
ja: 自動車用バルブ用途／位置: 補助灯/オフロードライト; ブレーキライト; カーテシライト/ドアライト; デイタイムランニングライト (DRL); フォグライト; フロントウィンカー; ヘッドライト (ハイビーム); ヘッドライト (ロービーム); メーター/クラスターライト; 室内灯/マップライト; ライセンスプレートライト; バイク用ヘッドライト; パーキング/ポジションライト; リアウィンカー; バックライト; サイドマーカーライト; テールライト/ランニングライト; ハイマウントストップランプ (CHMSL); トランク/ラゲッジライト; その他
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės lemputės paskirtis / padėtis: Pagalbinis / bekelės žibintas; Stabdžių žibintas; Apšvietimo / durų žibintas; Dienos žibintas (DRL); Rūko žibintas; Priekinis posūkio žibintas; Priekinis žibintas – tolimosios šviesos; Priekinis žibintas – artimosios šviesos; Prietaisų skydelio apšvietimas; Salono / skaitymo apšvietimas; Valstybinio numerio apšvietimas; Motociklo priekinis žibintas; Stovėjimo / gabaritinis žibintas; Galinis posūkio žibintas; Atbulinės eigos žibintas; Šoninis gabaritinis žibintas; Galinis / eigos žibintas; Trečiasis stabdžių žibintas (CHMSL); Bagažinės apšvietimas; Kita
es: Aplicación/posición de la bombilla para vehículos: Luz auxiliar/todoterreno; Luz de freno; Luz de cortesía/de puerta; Luz de circulación diurna (DRL); Luz antiniebla; Señal de giro delantera; Faro delantero: luz alta; Faro delantero: luz baja; Luz de instrumentos/tablero; Luz de techo interior/de lectura; Luz de matrícula; Faro de motocicleta; Luz de estacionamiento/posición; Señal de giro trasera; Luz de marcha atrás; Luz de posición lateral; Luz trasera/de marcha; Tercera luz de freno (CHMSL); Luz de maletero/carga; Otro
sv: Användningsområde/position för belysningslampa i motorfordon: Extraljus/offroadbelysning; Bromsljus; Instegs-/dörrbelysning; Varselljus (DRL); Dimljus; Blinkers fram; Strålkastare – helljus; Strålkastare – halvljus; Instrumentbelysning; Innerbelysning/läslampa; Registreringsskyltbelysning; Motorcykelstrålkastare; Parkerings-/positionsljus; Blinkers bak; Backljus; Sidomarkeringsljus; Bakljus; Tredje bromsljus (CHMSL); Bagage-/lastrumsbelysning; Annan
ru: Назначение и расположение автомобильной лампы: Дополнительное/внедорожное освещение; Стоп-сигнал; Подсветка порогов/дверей; Дневные ходовые огни (ДХО); Противотуманная фара; Передний указатель поворота; Фара — дальний свет; Фара — ближний свет; Подсветка приборной панели; Внутрисалонное освещение/подсветка для чтения; Подсветка номерного знака; Фара мотоцикла; Габаритный огонь/стояночный огонь; Задний указатель поворота; Фонарь заднего хода; Боковой габаритный огонь; Задний фонарь/габаритный огонь; Третий стоп-сигнал; Подсветка багажника/грузового отсека; Другое